Washington statutes.
RCW 43.220.040

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Agency administrative costs" means indirect expenses such as personnel, payroll, contract administration, fiscal services, and other overhead costs.

(2) "Corps" means the Washington conservation corps, including the Puget Sound corps.

(3) "Corps member" means an individual enrolled in the Washington conservation corps.

(4) "Corps member leaders" or "specialists" means members of the corps who serve in leadership or training capacities or who provide specialized services other than or in addition to the types of work and services that are performed by the corps members in general.

(5) "Crew supervisor" means temporary, project, or permanent state employees who supervise corps members and coordinate work project design and completion.

(6) "Department" means the department of ecology.

(7) "Program support costs" include, but are not limited to, program planning, development of reports, job and career training, uniforms and equipment, and standard office space and utilities. Program support costs do not include direct scheduling and supervision of corps members.

(8) "Public lands" means any lands or waters, or interests therein, owned or administered by any agency or instrumentality of the state, federal, or local government.

[ 2011 c 20 s 4. Prior: 1999 c 280 s 3; 1999 c 151 s 1301; 1987 c 367 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 40 s 4.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).

Findings—Intent—2011 c 20: See note following RCW 43.220.020.

Part headings not law—Effective date—1999 c 151: See notes following RCW 18.28.010.